Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 11 Venue and Service of Process for Actions Against Railroad Companies

46-8-310.
Venue for actions against lessee or possessor of railroad.

The lessees of any railroad or the company having possession of the railroad shall be liable to an action of any kind in the same court or jurisdiction as were the lessors or owners of the railroad before the lease.

History.

Ga. L. 1862-63, p. 161, § 1; Code 1868, § 3330; Code 1873, § 3407; Code 1882, § 3407; Civil Code 1895, § 2335; Civil Code 1910, § 2799; Code 1933, § 94-1102.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding venue for actions against railroad companies, §

46-1-2

.

Law reviews.

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).

46-8-311.
Manner of service of process on lessee of railroad.

When any person is sued as the lessee of a railroad, service of a petition, summons, or other process may be effected by delivering a copy thereof to the depot agent or other officer of such lessee in the county where the action is pending, or by leaving a copy at the place where the usual and ordinary public business of such lessee in said county is transacted.

History.

Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 49, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2336; Civil Code 1910, § 2800; Code 1933, § 94-1103.

46-8-312.
Service of process on lessor railroad company, generally.

Whenever any railroad company incorporated under the laws of this state or whose line of road may extend into this state has leased its line of road to any person and such lessee is in possession of the road, service on such lessor company may be perfected by delivering a copy of the summons and complaint to the president or other officer of the lessor company; provided, however, that if service cannot be had in this manner, then service may be made upon such company by delivering to the Secretary of State two copies of the summons and complaint, one copy of which shall be mailed by the Secretary of State to the lessor company at its last known address according to the Secretary of State. In addition, the plaintiff shall cause a copy of the summons and complaint to be served upon the lessee by the sheriff of the county where the action is brought or by his deputy or by the marshal or his deputy.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 137, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2337; Civil Code 1910, § 2801; Code 1933, § 94-1104.

46-8-313.
Manner of service where address of president of company unknown.

If the residence of the president of the lessor company is unknown to the plaintiff and his attorney, an affidavit showing the fact, filed with the Secretary of State, together with the petition, shall be sufficient, instead of the notice to the president required in Code Section 46-8-312, provided that the plaintiff shall not be compelled to bring an action against any such lessor and give the notice as provided in this Code section, but may do so at his option; but when such notice is given to the lessor, the judgment rendered in said action shall be as binding upon the lessor as though service had been made as provided by law for service upon railroad companies.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 137, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2338; Civil Code 1910, § 2802; Code 1933, § 94-1105.

46-8-314.
Venue and service of process in actions against receivers, trustees, and other officers of railroad companies; obtaining leave to sue.

Actions may be brought against receivers, trustees, assignees, and other like officers operating railroads in this state, in the same county, and service may be perfected by serving them or their agents in the same manner, as if the action had been brought against the corporation whose property or franchise is being operated by them. All such actions may be brought without leave to sue first having been obtained from any court.

History.

Ga. L. 1895, p. 103, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2325; Civil Code 1910, § 2789; Code 1933, § 94-1107.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding venue for actions against railroad companies, §

46-1-2

.

Law reviews.

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).